Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.710

Definitions.

The following terms, whenever used or referred to in RCW 28B.35.700 through 28B.35.790, shall have the following meaning, excepting in those instances where the context clearly indicates otherwise:

(1) The word "boards" means the boards of trustees of the regional universities and The Evergreen State College.

(2) The words "building fees" mean the building fees charged students registering at each college, but shall not mean the special tuition or other fees charged such students or fees, charges, rentals, and other income derived from any or all revenue-producing lands, buildings, and facilities of the respective colleges, heretofore or hereafter acquired, constructed or installed, including but not limited to income from rooms, dormitories, dining rooms, hospitals, infirmaries, housing or student activity buildings, vehicular parking facilities, land or the appurtenances thereon.

(3) The words "bond retirement funds" shall mean the special funds created by law and known as the Eastern Washington University bond retirement fund, Central Washington University bond retirement fund, Western Washington University bond retirement fund, and The Evergreen State College bond retirement fund, all as referred to in RCW 28B.35.370.

(4) The word "bonds" means the bonds payable out of the bond retirement funds.

(5) The word "projects" means the construction, completion, reconstruction, remodeling, rehabilitation, or improvement of any building or other facility of any of the aforementioned colleges authorized by the legislature at any time and to be financed by the issuance and sale of bonds.

[ 1985 c 390 s 49; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 83; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.710. Prior: 1967 c 47 s 13; 1961 ex.s. c 14 s 2. Formerly RCW 28B.40.710; 28.81.510.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.